Hawaii, session 2026, SB845.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§286- Special interest vehicles; former military vehicles.  (a)  Any person who is the owner of a former military vehicle may apply for registration with the director of finance of the county in which the former military vehicle is located. (b)  A former military vehicle may be used as other vehicles of the same type, including to transport the owner's property where the transportation is in furtherance of the owner's primary business.  A former military vehicle may also be used to transport passengers without charge where the transportation is in furtherance of the owner's primary business; provided that transportation is directly to and from the owner's place of business. (c)  A former military vehicle shall not: (1)  Be used for the transportation of persons for hire or the transportation of property, as those terms are defined in section 271-4; or (2)  Carry material weighing more than five hundred pounds, not including the weight of: (A)  A mounted camper, lid, or cap; (B)  A trailer or load drawn by the former military vehicle; or (C)  Any persons riding within the driver's compartment. (d)  As used in this section, "former military vehicle" means any of the following vehicles, if the vehicle is at least twenty-five years old: (1)  A high-mobility, all-terrain, four-wheel or six-wheel drive vehicle originally manufactured for military use and commonly known by the trade name "Pinzgauer"; (2)  A vehicle commonly known as a "Kaiser Jeep M715"; (3)  A high-mobility, multipurpose wheeled vehicle originally manufactured for military use and commonly known as a "Humvee"; or (4)  A six-wheel drive utility vehicle originally manufactured for military use, commonly known as a "DUKW" or "Duck"." SECTION 2.  Section 286-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "special interest vehicle" to read as follows: ""Special interest vehicle" means a vehicle of any age that, because of its significance, is being collected, preserved, restored, or maintained by a collector.  The term includes a street rod vehicle and a street rod replica vehicle, as those terms are defined in section 286-26.5; a vehicle manufactured before 1968; [and] a vehicle manufactured after 1967 to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1968[.]; and a former military vehicle, as defined in section 286-   ." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________